Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.4931

Additional special pension for former members not receiving social security.

(1) The benefits provided under subsection (2) of this section shall be available only to former members who have reached age sixty-five or are disabled for further public school service and are not receiving federal old age, survivors or disability benefit payments (social security) and are not able to qualify for such benefits.

(2) Effective July 1, 1987, former members who receive the minimum retirement allowance provided by RCW 41.32.485(1) and who meet the requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall receive an additional special pension of ten dollars per month per year of service credit.

[ 1987 c 455 s 6; 1973 2nd ex.s. c 32 s 3; 1967 c 151 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1987 c 455: See note following RCW 41.32.485.

Emergency—Severability—1973 2nd ex.s. c 32: See notes following RCW 41.32.310.

Effective date—Severability—1967 c 151: See notes following RCW 41.32.480.